Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1640
Community Health Worker Training Endorsement Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1640 to 71-1644 shall be known and may be cited as the Community Health Worker Training Endorsement Act.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 1.
July 18, 2026